Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-662
Brain injury; department; provide information regarding services.

Within thirty days after receiving a report of brain or head injury, the department shall provide relevant and timely information to the person with such injury to assist such person in accessing necessary and appropriate services relating to such injury. The department may develop such information or utilize information developed by other sources and approved by the department. The department may provide such information directly or contract with an appropriate entity to provide such information. Costs associated with providing such information shall be paid from cash funds, gifts, and grants. No General Funds shall be used to pay such costs. Funds received by the department for the payment of such costs shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Health and Human Services Cash Fund. The department shall not be required to provide information under this section if sufficient funding is unavailable.

Laws 2008, LB928, § 40.